Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. Definitions.

Sec. 13.21.005.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“local administration” means administration by a personal representative appointed in this state under appointment proceedings described in AS 13.16;

“local personal representative” includes any personal representative appointed in this state under appointment proceedings described in AS 13.16 and excludes foreign personal representatives who acquire the power of a local personal representative under AS

13.21.035

;

“resident creditor” means a person domiciled in, or doing business in this state, who is, or could be, a claimant against an estate of a nonresident decedent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)